Wyoming, session 2026, SF0068.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 41-3-771, 41-7-402(a) and 41-8-121(a)
are amended to read:
41-3-771. Methods of levying and collecting; class A.
To levy and collect taxes under class A as provided in W.S.
41-3-770, the board shall, in each year, determine the
amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking
into consideration other sources of revenue of the
district, and shall fix a rate of levy which when levied
upon every dollar of assessed valuation of property within
the district, and with other revenues will raise the amount
required by the district, to supply funds for paying
expenses of organization, for surveys and plans, paying the
costs of construction, operating and maintaining the works
of the district; provided, however, that said rate shall
not exceed one-half (1/2) mill on the dollar, prior to the
delivery of water from the works, and thereafter not to
exceed one (1) mill on the dollar, of assessed valuation of
the property within the district, except in the event of
accruing defaults and/or deficiencies where an additional
levy may be made as provided in W.S. 41-3-775 and except as
authorized in this section for major maintenance projects.
The board shall on or before the third Monday of July of
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0068
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
each year, certify to the board of county commissioners of
each county within the district or having a portion of its
territory in the district, the rate so fixed with direction
that at the time and in the manner required by law for
levying of taxes for county purposes, such board of county
commissioners shall levy such tax upon the assessed
valuation of all property within the district, in addition
to such other taxes as may be levied by such board of
county commissioners, at the rate so fixed and determined;
provided, however, that said assessment and tax levied
under the provisions of this act shall not be construed as
being a part of the general county mill levy. The amount to
be raised under this section may include an amount for
major maintenance projects for any aging irrigation
infrastructure project. An amount not to exceed one (1)
additional mill may be assessed for the purpose of major
maintenance projects. All amounts assessed for major
maintenance projects shall be held in a separate major
maintenance account and funds in the account may be
invested with the state treasurer in local government
investment equity pools.
41-7-402. Due dates; annual budget of district;
hearings on budget; petition for additional funds; hearings
on petition.
(a) Assessments to meet expenses of any current year
of any district shall become due, payable and delinquent at
such time or times each year as may be fixed by law for
state and county taxes to become due, payable and
delinquent. Commissioners having charge of any irrigation
district shall on or before the first Tuesday of June of
each year file with the clerk of the court having
jurisdiction of such district, a report showing an itemized
estimate of the money to be raised by assessment within the
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0068
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
district for the purpose of constructing new work,
maintenance and to meet the yearly current expenses of the
district. In addition to the amount above provided, the
commissioners may add a sum which in their judgment shall
be sufficient to provide for possible delinquencies. Within
thirty (30) days after filing such annual report, at a time
and place to be fixed by the court or a judge thereof, the
judge shall examine such report, hear all objections
thereto, fix and determine the amount to be raised by
assessments for the current year and cause such
adjudication to be entered of record in said court and a
certified copy thereof to be delivered to the commissioners
of such district. The commissioners shall add thereto such
amount as may be necessary to meet the principal and
interest on lawful indebtedness of the district maturing
during the current year, together with a sum which in their
judgment shall be sufficient to provide for possible
delinquencies. When thus completed it shall be known as
"the budget of .... district for the year (year)" and also
be verified under oath by any one (1) of the commissioners.
The amount to be raised under this subsection may also
include an amount for major maintenance projects for any
aging irrigation infrastructure project. All amounts
assessed for major maintenance projects shall be held in a
separate major maintenance account and shall be pooled
until the amount in the account is sufficient to provide
funding for the major maintenance project. Funds in the
major maintenance account may be invested with the state
treasurer in local government investment pools.
41-8-121. Assessments generally.
(a) The board of directors shall, on or before the
third Monday in July of each year, certify to the board of
county commissioners of the county within the watershed
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0068
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
improvement district in which assessed land is located the
amount of the annual installments of assessments against
the land, together with a fair proportionate amount of the
estimated operating and maintenance charges apportioned to
the land for the next succeeding year. Thereupon the county
commissioners shall certify to and deliver the assessment
roll to the county assessor of the county and the county
assessor shall extend the amounts so certified on the tax
roll as a flat special assessment against the land
benefited. The assessments shall be subject to the same
interest and penalties in case of delinquency as in the
case of general taxes, and shall be collected at the same
time and in the same manner as in the case of general
taxes; provided, that the assessments shall become due and
payable only at the times and in the amounts as may be
determined by the board of directors. The amount to be
raised under this subsection may also include an amount for
major maintenance projects for any aging irrigation
infrastructure project. All amounts assessed for major
maintenance projects shall be held in a separate major
maintenance account and shall be pooled until the amount in
the account is sufficient to provide funding for the major
maintenance project. Funds in the major maintenance account
may be invested with the state treasurer in local
government investment pools.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0068
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5